Alabama, session 2026rs, HB82.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
6 Section 1. The boundary lines and corporate limits of
7 the City of Daphne in Baldwin County are altered and
8 rearranged to include within the corporate limits of the
9 municipality, in addition to the lands now included, all of
10 the following territory:
11 TERRITORY A (Parcels 05-43-06-14-0-000-007.000;
12 05-43-06-14-0-000-006.001; 05-43-06-14-0-000-007.006;
13 05-43-06-14-0-000-021.000; 05-43-06-14-0-000-022.000;
14 05-43-06-14-0-000-006.000; and 05-43-06-14-0-000-021.001)
15 BEGIN AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SAINT AUGUSTINE PHASE
16 5, AS SHOWN IN MAP OR PLAT THEREOF RECORDED IN SLIDE 2894-A,
17 PROBATE RECORDS, BALDWIN COUNTY, ALABAMA, SAID POINT BEING
18 ALSO ON THE WEST RIGHT-OF-WAY OF COUNTY ROAD 54 W; THENCE RUN
19 SOUTH, ALONG SAID WEST RIGHT-OF WAY, A DISTANCE OF 2,580 FEET,
20 MORE OR LESS, TO A POINT ON THE NORTH RIGHT-OF-WAY OF COUNTY
21 ROAD 64; THENCE RUN WEST, ALONG SAID NORTH RIGHT-OF-WAY, A
22 DISTANCE OF 2,580 FEET, MORE OR LESS, TO A POINT ON THE EAST
23 RIGHT-OF-WAY OF RIGSBY ROAD; THENCE RUN NORTH, ALONG SAID EAST
24 RIGHT-OF-WAY, A DISTANCE OF 2,260 FEET, MORE OR LESS, TO THE
25 SOUTHWEST CORNER OF PARKER SUBDIVISION, AS SHOWN IN MAP OR
26 PLAT THEREOF RECORDED IN SUDE 2540-A, PROBATE RECORDS, BALDWIN
27 COUNTY, ALABAMA; THENCE RUN EAST, ALONG THE SOUTH LINE OF SAID
28 PARKER SUBDIVISION AND A CONTINUATION THEREOF, A DISTANCE OF
Page 1

PARKER SUBDIVISION AND A CONTINUATION THEREOF, A DISTANCE OF
HB82 Enrolled
29 1,290 FEET TO THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF LANDS HERETOFORE
30 CONVEYED TO L.B. WOODRUFF, III AND JAIMIE WOODRUFF, RECORDED
31 AT INSTRUMENT 2023051, PROBATE RECORDS, BALDWIN COUNTY,
32 ALABAMA; THENCE RUN NORTH, ALONG THE EAST LINE OF SAID L.B.
33 WOODRUFF, III AND JAIMIE WOODRUFF LANDS, A DISTANCE OF 330
34 FEET, MORE OR LESS, TO A POINT ON THE SOUTH LINE OF SAINT
35 AUGUSTINE PHASE 1A, AS SHOWN IN MAP OR PLAT THEREOF RECORDED
36 IN SLIDES 2451-A, B AND C, PROBATE RECORDS, BALDWIN COUNTY,
37 ALABAMA; THENCE RUN EAST, ALONG SAID SOUTH LINE AND A
38 CONTINUATION THEREOF, A DISTANCE OF 1,290 FEET, MORE OR LESS,
39 TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING.
40 TERRITORY B (Parcel 05-43-06-13-0-000-015.000)
41 COMMENCING AT THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF SECTION 13,
42 TOWNSHIP 5 SOUTH, RANGE 2 EAST, BALDWIN COUNTY, ALABAMA;
43 THENCE RUN NORTH, ALONG THE WEST LINE OF SAID SECTION 13, A
44 DISTANCE OF 370 FEET, MORE OR LESS; THENCE RUN EAST, A
45 DISTANCE OF 40 FEET, MORE OR LESS TO THE EAST RIGHT-OF-WAY OF
46 COUNTY ROAD 54 W FOR THE POINT OF BEGINNING: THENCE RUN NORTH,
47 ALONG SAID EAST RIGHT-OF-WAY OF COUNTY ROAD 54 W, A DISTANCE
48 OF 785 FEET; THENCE RUN EAST, A DISTANCE OF 1,290 FEET, MORE
49 OR LESS; THENCE RUN SOUTH, A DISTANCE OF 660 FEET, MORE OR
50 LESS; THENCE RUN WEST, A DISTANCE OF 430 FEET, MORE OR LESS;
51 THENCE RUN SOUTH, A DISTANCE OF 480 FEET, MORE OR LESS, TO A
52 POINT ON THE NORTH RIGHT-OF-WAY OF COUNTY ROAD 64; THENCE RUN
53 WEST, ALONG SAID NORTH RIGHT-OF-WAY, A DISTANCE OF 430 FEET,
54 MORE OR LESS; THENCE RUN NORTH, DEPARTING SAID NORTH
55 RIGHT-OF-WAY OF COUNTY ROAD 64, A DISTANCE OF 330 FEET, MORE
56 OR LESS; THENCE RUN WEST, A DISTANCE OF 440 FEET TO THE POINT
Page 2

OR LESS; THENCE RUN WEST, A DISTANCE OF 440 FEET TO THE POINT
HB82 Enrolled
57 OF BEGINNING.
58 TERRITORY C (Parcel 05-43-06-14-0-000-013.002)
59 LOT 1A, SIMMS-FOSTER SUBDIVISION, ACCORDING TO THE PLAT
60 THEREOF, RECORDED AS SLIDE 2825-A IN THE PROBATE OFFICE OF
61 BALDWIN COUNTY, ALABAMA.
62 TERRITORY D(1) (1st of 2 portions of Parcel
63 05-43-02-03-0-000-004.000)
64 COMMENCE AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SECTION 3, TOWNSHIP
65 5 SOUTH, RANGE 2 EAST, BALDWIN COUNTY, ALABAMA; THENCE WEST A
66 DISTANCE OF 92 FEET TO A POINT ON THE WEST MARGIN OF ALABAMA
67 STATE HIGHWAY NO. 181 MARKED BY A CAPPED IRON ROD (REBAR);
68 THENCE ALONG SAID WEST MARGIN NORTH 00'05'49" EAST A DISTANCE
69 OF 120.00 FEET TO A POINT MARKED BY A CAPPED IRON ROD (REBAR)
70 FOR THE POINT OF BEGINNING OF THE PROPERTY HEREIN DESCRIBED;
71 THENCE DEPARTING SAID WEST MARGIN NORTH 89'39'06" WEST A
72 DISTANCE OF 223.00 FEET TO A POINT MARKED BY A CAPPED IRON ROD
73 (REBAR); THENCE SOUTH 00'05'49" WEST A DISTANCE OF 120.00 FEET
74 TO A POINT MARKED BY A CAPPED IRON ROD (REBAR); THENCE NORTH
75 89'39'06" WEST A DISTANCE OF 1010.39 FEET TO A POINT MARKED BY
76 A CAPPED IRON ROD (REBAR); THENCE NORTH 00'15'30" EAST A
77 DISTANCE OF 333.15 FEET TO A POINT MARKED BY AN OPEN TOP IRON
78 PIPE; THENCE SOUTH 89'39'06" EAST A DISTANCE OF 1232.45 FEET
79 TO A POINT ON THE AFORESAID WEST MARGIN MARKED BY A CAPPED
80 IRON ROD (REBAR); THENCE ALONG SAID WEST MARGIN SOUTH
81 00'05'49" WEST A DISTANCE OF 213.16 FEET TO THE POINT OF
82 BEGINNING; CONTAINING 383,992 SQUARE FEET (8.82 ACRES) MORE OR
83 LESS.
84 TERRITORY D(2) (2nd of 2 portions of Parcel
Page 3

TERRITORY D(2) (2nd of 2 portions of Parcel
HB82 Enrolled
85 05-43-02-03-0-000-004.000)
86 COMMENCE AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SECTION 3, TOWNSHIP
87 5 SOUTH, RANGE 2 EAST, BALDWIN COUNTY, ALABAMA; THENCE WEST A
88 DISTANCE OF 92 FEET TO A POINT ON THE WEST MARGIN OF ALABAMA
89 STATE HIGHWAY NO. 181 MARKED BY A CAPPED IRON ROD (REBAR) FOR
90 THE POINT OF BEGINNING OF THE PROPERTY HEREIN DESCRIBED;
91 THENCE ALONG SAID WEST MARGIN NORTH 00'05'49" EAST A DISTANCE
92 OF 120.00 FEET TO A POINT MARKED BY A CAPPED IRON ROD (REBAR);
93 THENCE DEPARTING SAID WEST MARGIN NORTH 89'39'06" WEST A
94 DISTANCE OF 223.00 FEET TO A POINT MARKED BY A CAPPED IRON ROD
95 (REBAR); THENCE SOUTH 00'05'49" WEST A DISTANCE OF 120.00 FEET
96 TO A POINT MARKED BY A CAPPED IRON ROD (REBAR); THENCE SOUTH
97 89'39'06" EAST A DISTANCE OF 223.00 FEET TO THE POINT OF
98 BEGINNING; CONTAINING 26,760 SQUARE FEET (0.61 ACRES) MORE OR
99 LESS.
100 TERRITORY E(1) (1st of 2 portions of Parcel
101 05-43-02-10-0-000-002.000)
102 COMMENCE AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SECTION 3, TOWNSHIP
103 5 SOUTH, RANGE 2 EAST, BALDWIN COUNTY, ALABAMA; THENCE WEST A
104 DISTANCE OF 92 FEET TO A POINT ON THE WEST MARGIN OF ALABAMA
105 STATE HIGHWAY NO. 181 MARKED BY A CAPPED IRON ROD (REBAR) FOR
106 THE POINT OF BEGINNING OF THE PROPERTY HEREIN DESCRIBED;
107 THENCE ALONG SAID WEST MARGIN SOUTH 00'05'49" WEST A DISTANCE
108 OF 60.00 FEET TO A POINT MARKED BY A CAPPED IRON ROD (REBAR);
109 THENCE DEPARTING SAID WEST MARGIN NORTH 89'37'35" WEST A
110 DISTANCE OF 222.90 FEET TO A POINT MARKED BY AN IRON ROD
111 (REBAR); THENCE SOUTH 00'06'25" WEST A DISTANCE OF 473.29 FEET
112 TO A POINT MARKED BY AN IRON ROD (REBAR); THENCE SOUTH
Page 4

TO A POINT MARKED BY AN IRON ROD (REBAR); THENCE SOUTH
HB82 Enrolled
113 89'37'35" EAST A DISTANCE OF 222.98 FEET TO A POINT ON THE
114 AFORESAID WEST MARGIN; THENCE ALONG SAID WEST MARGIN SOUTH
115 00'05'49" WEST A DISTANCE OF 292.76 FEET TO A POINT MARKED BY
116 A CAPPED IRON ROD (REBAR); THENCE DEPARTING SAID WEST MARGIN
117 NORTH 89'38'46" WEST A DISTANCE OF 224.79 FEET TO A POINT
118 MARKED BY A CAPPED IRON ROD (REBAR); THENCE NORTH 89'35'43"
119 WEST A DISTANCE OF 364.84 FEET TO A POINT MARKED BY A CAPPED
120 IRON ROD (REBAR); THENCE NORTH 00'13'44" EAST A DISTANCE OF
121 498.24 FEET TO A POINT MARKED BY A CAPPED IRON ROD (REBAR);
122 THENCE NORTH 8231'42" WEST A DISTANCE OF 650.99 FEET TO A
123 POINT IN A LARGE GULLY; THENCE NORTH 00'15'30" EAST A DISTANCE
124 OF 246.68 FEET TO A POINT MARKED BY A CAPPED IRON ROD (REBAR);
125 THENCE SOUTH 89'39'06" EAST A DISTANCE OF 1233.39 FEET TO THE
126 POINT OF BEGINNING; CONTAINING 566,030 SQUARE FEET (12.99
127 ACRES) MORE OR LESS.
128 TERRITORY E(2) (2nd of 2 portions of Parcel
129 05-43-02-10-0-000-002.000)
130 COMMENCE AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SECTION 3, TOWNSHIP
131 5 SOUTH, RANGE 2 EAST, BALDWIN COUNTY, ALABAMA; THENCE WEST A
132 DISTANCE OF 92 FEET TO A POINT ON THE WEST MARGIN OF ALABAMA
133 STATE HIGHWAY NO. 181 MARKED BY A CAPPED IRON ROD (REBAR);
134 THENCE ALONG SAID WEST MARGIN SOUTH 00'05'49" WEST A DISTANCE
135 OF 218.26 FEET TO A POINT MARKED BY A CAPPED IRON ROD (REBAR)
136 FOR THE POINT OF BEGINNING OF THE PROPERTY HEREIN DESCRIBED;
137 CONTINUE THENCE ALONG SAID WEST MARGIN SOUTH 00'05'49" WEST A
138 DISTANCE OF 157.56 FEET TO A POINT MARKED BY A CAPPED IRON ROD
139 (REBAR): THENCE DEPARTING SAID WEST MARGIN NORTH 89'37'35"
140 WEST A DISTANCE OF 222.96 FEET TO A POINT MARKED BY AN IRON
Page 5

WEST A DISTANCE OF 222.96 FEET TO A POINT MARKED BY AN IRON
HB82 Enrolled
141 ROD (REBAR); THENCE NORTH 00'06'25" EAST A DISTANCE OF 157.56
142 FEET TO A POINT; THENCE SOUTH 89'37'35" EAST A DISTANCE OF
143 222.93 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING; CONTAINING 35,127
144 SQUARE FEET (0.81 ACRES) MORE OR LESS.
145 Section 2. In accordance with Section 11-42-6 of the
146 Code of Alabama 1975, a map showing the proposed territory to
147 be altered, rearranged, and extended from the City of Daphne
148 is on file and open to public inspection in the Office of the
149 Baldwin County Judge of Probate.
150 Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 6

Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB82 Enrolled
151
152
153
154
155
156
157 ________________________________________________
158 Speaker of the House of Representatives
159
160
161
162 ________________________________________________
163 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
164
165
166 House of Representatives
167
168 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
169 was passed by the House 21-Jan-26.
170
171 John Treadwell
172 Clerk
173
174
175
176
177
178 Senate 12-Feb-26 Passed
179
180
181
Page 7